Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 10. Civil in rem Forfeiture.

History.

(§ 3 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 36, SLA 2016, which enacted this article, took effect on October 9, 2016.

Sec. 09.55.700.
In rem civil forfeiture actions.

Common law civil in rem forfeiture actions are abolished if used instead of a criminal proceeding.

History.

(§ 3 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the severability of this section, see sec. 186, ch. 36, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.